District of Columbia statutes.
47-1058

Emmaus Rehabilitation Project, lot 74 in square 366.

The real property, described as lot 74 in square 366 in the District of Columbia, is hereby exempt from real property and transfer and deed recordation taxation so long as, and to the extent that, the same is occupied by Emmaus Services for the Aging, Inc., an organization qualifying under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 , approved October 22, 1986 (100 Stat. 2085; 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) ), and is used to further the tax-exempt purposes of Emmaus Services for the Aging, Inc. Any real property and transfer and deed recordation taxes paid shall be refunded to the payer under the same conditions and subject to the same provisions as if the exemption were granted administratively.

Apr. 24, 2004, D.C. Law 15-153, § 2, 51 DCR 2601
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 103, 52 DCR 2638
D.C. Law 15-354 validated a previously made technical correction.
For Temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Emmaus Rehabilitation Project Real Property Exemption Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-78, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3370).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Emmaus Rehabilitation Project Real Property Tax Exemption Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-203, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9838).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Emmaus Rehabilitation Project Real Property Exemption Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-340, January 29, 2004, 51 DCR 1820).
Section 3 of Law 15-153 provided: “Sec. 3. Applicability. Section 2 shall apply as of April 9, 2003.”